Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 5. PROTECTION OF CONSUMER INTERESTS

SUBTITLE G. REGULATION OF INSURER MARKET CONDUCT

CHAPTER 752. ENFORCEMENT OF BALANCE BILLING PROHIBITIONS

Sec. 752.0001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "administrator" has the meaning assigned by Section 1467.001.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1264), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 752.0002. INJUNCTION FOR BALANCE BILLING. (a) If the attorney general receives a referral from the appropriate regulatory agency indicating that an individual or entity, including a health benefit plan issuer or administrator, has exhibited a pattern of intentionally violating a law that prohibits the individual or entity from billing an insured, participant, or enrollee in an amount greater than an applicable copayment, coinsurance, and deductible under the insured's, participant's, or enrollee's managed care plan or that imposes a requirement related to that prohibition, the attorney general may bring a civil action in the name of the state to enjoin the individual or entity from the violation.

(b) If the attorney general prevails in an action brought under Subsection (a), the attorney general may recover reasonable attorney's fees, costs, and expenses, including court costs and witness fees, incurred in bringing the action.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1264), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 752.0003. ENFORCEMENT BY REGULATORY AGENCY. (a) An appropriate regulatory agency that licenses, certifies, or otherwise authorizes a physician, health care practitioner, health care facility, or other health care provider to practice or operate in this state may take disciplinary action against the physician, practitioner, facility, or provider if the physician, practitioner, facility, or provider violates a law that prohibits the physician, practitioner, facility, or provider from billing an insured, participant, or enrollee in an amount greater than an applicable copayment, coinsurance, and deductible under the insured's, participant's, or enrollee's managed care plan or that imposes a requirement related to that prohibition.

(b) The department may take disciplinary action against a health benefit plan issuer or administrator if the issuer or administrator violates a law requiring the issuer or administrator to provide notice of a balance billing prohibition or make a related disclosure.

(c) A regulatory agency described by Subsection (a) or the commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section. Section 2001.0045, Government Code, does not apply to rules adopted under this subsection.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1342 (S.B. 1264), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2019.